Utah statutes.
62A-4a-1004.   Risk assessment training -- Second health care opinion.

(1)  The division shall train its child protection workers to apply the risk assessment tools and rules established under Subsection 62A-4a-1002(2).

(2)  Nothing in Subsection 62A-4a-1002(1)(b)(iii) may prohibit a parent or guardian from exercising the right to obtain a second health care opinion.

